California, session 20252026, AB2707.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 501 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:501. There is in the Natural Resources Agency, Agency the Department of Parks and Recreation. The department shall be conducted under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of Parks and Recreation. The director shall be appointed by and hold office at the pleasure of the Governor and shall receive an annual salary as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The appointment of the director shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.